Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202616-1012
Police officer; temporary disability; workers' compensation benefits; how treated.

(1) No police officer shall be entitled during any period of temporary disability to receive in full both such police officer's salary and such police officer's benefits under the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act.

(2) All Nebraska workers' compensation benefits shall be payable in full to such police officer as provided in the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act, but all amounts paid by the city or its insurer under the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act to any disabled police officer entitled to receive a salary during such disability shall be considered as payments on account of such salary and shall be credited thereon.

(3) The remaining balance of such salary, if any, shall be payable as otherwise provided in the Cities of the First Class Police Officers Retirement Act.

Laws 1983, LB 237, § 12;

Laws 1985, LB 3, § 1;

Laws 1986, LB 811, § 5;

Laws 2012, LB1082, § 10;

Laws 2026, LB822, § 12.
July 18, 2026
Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act, see section 48-1,110.